California statutes. Education Code
The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall survey local community college districts to determine the level and type of services needed and available for welfare recipients pursuant to Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall develop a plan and standards for the level of participation by community college districts required to meet the goal of providing open entry/open exit education, skills training, assessment, and counseling to these recipients. The plan shall provide for local in-service training and technical assistance to community college districts in development of contracts and programs in cooperation with county welfare agencies, service delivery areas under the Job Training Partnership Act, and others necessary to carry out the intent of that article. The plan shall also provide for the identification of necessary funding levels and sources of funding, including employer-based training and funds available under Section 202(b)(1) of the Job Training Partnership Act, to meet the goals of Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the development and implementation of monitoring and reporting tools for the continued participation of community college districts in the provision of services under contracts required by that article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 279.)
-------------------------------------------

71051.

(a) The board of governors shall develop a process for the approval and funding of new collaborative facilities projects that are proposed by community college districts.

(b) The board of governors shall not implement subdivision (a) without statutory authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Office of Chancellor [71090. - 71095.]

71090.

(a) The board shall appoint a chief executive officer, to be known as the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and fix his or her compensation.

(b) The chancellor shall execute the duties and responsibilities as may be delegated to him or her by the board. Whenever in this code a power is vested in the board, the board, by a majority vote, may adopt a rule delegating that power to the chancellor or any officer, employee, or committee as the board may designate. The rule shall prescribe the limits of the delegation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 281.)
-------------------------------------------

71090.5.

In addition to the position authorized by subdivision (e) of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution, the Governor, with the recommendation of the board of governors, shall appoint up to six deputy and vice chancellors, who shall be exempt from state civil service. The appointments shall not exceed an aggregate total of six, for both the positions of deputy and vice chancellor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

71092.

(a) The board of governors shall employ and fix the compensation, in accordance with law, of assistants, clerical, and other employees as it deems necessary for the effective conduct of the work of the board and the chancellor’s office.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 19849.5 of the Government Code, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall designate the headquarters for each of its employees, except as provided in Section 71004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 954, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71093.

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) The board of governors may authorize the chancellor to suspend the authority of the Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District, or of any of the members of that board, to exercise any powers or responsibilities or to take any official actions with respect to the management of the district, including any of the district’s assets, contracts, expenditures, facilities, funds, personnel, or property. The board of governors may authorize suspension for a period up to five years from the effective date of Assembly Bill 318 of the 2005–06 Regular Session, plus a period lasting until the chancellor, the Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, the Director of Finance, and the Governor concur with the special trustee that the district has,
 for two consecutive academic years, met the requirements of the comprehensive assessment conducted, and the recovery plan prepared, pursuant to Section 41329.59.

(b) A suspension authorized by this section becomes effective immediately upon the delivery of a document to the administrative offices of the Compton Community College District that sets forth the finding of the chancellor that a suspension pursuant to this section is necessary for the establishment of fiscal integrity and security in that district.

(c) (1) If and when the chancellor suspends the authority of the Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District or any of its members pursuant to this section, the chancellor may appoint a special trustee as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 84040, at district expense, to manage the district. The chancellor is
 authorized to assume, and delegate to the special trustee, those powers and duties of the Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District that the chancellor determines, with the approval of the board of governors, are necessary for the management of that district. The Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District may not exercise any of the duties or powers assumed by the chancellor under this section.

(2) The chancellor may appoint as a special trustee under this section a person who has served in a similar capacity. A special trustee appointed under this section shall serve at the pleasure of the chancellor.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, in order to facilitate the appointment of the special trustee, the chancellor is exempt, for purposes of this section, from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of
 the Military and Veterans Code and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, at any time that this section is in effect, the chancellor is authorized to assume, and delegate to the special trustee, those powers and duties of the Compton Community College District Personnel Commission that the chancellor determines are necessary for the management of the personnel functions of the Compton Community College District. The personnel commission may not exercise any of the powers or duties assumed by the chancellor.

(2) (A) If and when the suspension of the authority of the Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District has ended pursuant to subdivision (a), the board of trustees shall assume those powers and duties of the Compton Community College
 District Personnel Commission that the board of trustees determines are necessary for the management of the personnel functions of the Compton Community College District. The personnel commission shall not exercise any of the powers or duties assumed by the board of trustees.

(B) Subparagraph (A) shall remain in effect until one calendar year after the Compton Community College District has repaid to the state the emergency apportionment funding pursuant to Section 41329.58.

(C) Beginning one calendar year after the Compton Community College District has made its final payment to the state for the emergency apportionment funding pursuant to Section 41329.58, the Compton Community College District Personnel Commission shall be reinstated to exercise the powers and duties necessary for the management of the personnel functions of the Compton Community College District.

(3) (A) Beginning in the year in which the Compton Community College District has repaid the emergency apportionment pursuant to Section 41329.58, the Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District shall establish the Compton Community College District Personnel Commission in an advisory capacity. Members of the personnel commission shall be appointed pursuant to subparagraph (B). The personnel commission shall advise the board of trustees on the powers and duties assumed by the board of trustees pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(B) One member of the Compton Community College District Personnel Commission shall be appointed by the Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District. One member of the personnel commission shall be nominated by the classified employees of the Compton Community College District and appointed by
 the board of trustees. Those two members shall, in turn, appoint the third member of the personnel commission.

(C) As used in this section, “classified employees” means an exclusive representative that represents the largest number of noncertificated employees in a unit or units within the Compton Community College District. If there is no exclusive representative within the district, the board of trustees shall, by written rule, prescribe the method by which the recommendation is to be made by the district’s classified employees.

(4) On or before September 15 the year after the Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District establishes the Compton Community College District Personnel Commission in an advisory capacity pursuant to paragraph (3), the personnel commission shall provide a report of duties fulfilled in its advisory role to the board of trustees and shall
 make the report available to the public on the internet website of the Compton Community College District.

(5) Beginning on or before September 15, 2023, and annually thereafter, the Compton Community College District shall provide to the Department of Finance, the Assembly Budget Subcommittee on Education Finance, and the Senate Budget Subcommittee on Education an update on its repayment of the emergency apportionment funding pursuant to Section 41329.58. The update shall include the principal loan balance, annual loan payment, and the loan repayment schedule.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, if the special trustee has been a member of the State Teachers’ Retirement System or the Public Employees’ Retirement System at any time before appointment, the special trustee shall, for the period of service as special trustee, be a member of the system to which the special trustee
 belonged, unless the special trustee elects, in writing, not to be a member. If the special trustee chooses to be a member, the special trustee shall be placed on the payroll of the district, or the payroll of another local educational agency or other entity that the district has an exchange agreement with pursuant to Section 87422 or other applicable laws, for the purpose of providing appropriate contributions to the applicable retirement system.

(f) The special trustee appointed pursuant to this section is authorized to do all of the following:

(1) Implement substantial changes in the fiscal policies and practices of the Compton Community College District.

(2) Revise the academic program of the Compton Community College District to reflect realistic income projections in response to the dramatic effect of the
 changes in fiscal policies and practices upon program quality.

(3) Encourage all members of the college community to accept a fair share of the burden of the full recovery of the Compton Community College District in the five operational areas of finance, academics, personnel, facilities, and governance.

(4) Enter into agreements on behalf of the Compton Community College District and, subject to any contractual and statutory obligation of the Compton Community College District, change any existing district rules, regulations, policies, or practices as necessary for the effective implementation of the recovery plan. Any agreement authorized by this section shall be binding upon the district for the term of the agreement, notwithstanding the removal of the special trustee for any reason or the reinstatement of any powers or responsibilities of the board of trustees. No agreement
 authorized by this paragraph shall materially impair the security and other interests of the holders of any bonds issued pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 63049.67) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code.

(5) Appoint an advisory committee to advise the special trustee with respect to the management of the Compton Community College District and the establishment and implementation of the arrangements for provision of services by a partner district pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 74292) of Chapter 5 of Part 46. This advisory committee may include residents of the communities served by the Compton Community College District, and any outside experts deemed appropriate by the special trustee. No member of the advisory committee shall receive any compensation or benefits for their services as a member of the advisory committee.

(g) In
 the event of a vacancy in the special trustee position, the chancellor shall temporarily assume all of the powers and duties of the special trustee until another special trustee can be appointed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 47.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

71094.

The chancellor’s office may contract with community college districts for the performance of administrative services necessary to implement Section 12419.7 of the Government Code. The chancellor’s office may charge the districts for the costs of those administrative services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 937, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

71094.5.

(a) (1) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges may implement a data request fee policy for researchers applying for access to individually identifiable data, student data, or both.

(2) A data request fee policy implemented pursuant to this section shall adhere to both of the following requirements:

(A) Be reviewed and approved by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, revised periodically, and made publicly available and posted in a prominent location on the chancellor’s internet website.

(B) Comply with applicable federal and state laws to protect individual privacy, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code.

(b) Fees or charges imposed upon an applicant pursuant to this section shall compensate for significant data compilation, extraction, or programming use of the data system by the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to recover costs that would otherwise typically be borne by the requesting data researcher, the chancellor’s office, or both.

(c) Fees or charges shall not be imposed pursuant to this section upon
 any of the following:

(1) A state agency, except for fees or charges related to the release of data for research purposes to the University of California, the California State University, or the State Department of Education.

(2) An undergraduate or graduate student seeking data for the student’s individual studies.

(3) A community college faculty member seeking data for the faculty member’s individual research.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 753, Sec. 1.   (SB 391)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

71095.

(a) The chancellor’s office, in consultation with the Office of Emergency Services, shall develop emergency preparedness standards and guidelines to assist community college districts and campuses in the event of a natural disaster, hazardous condition, or terrorist activity on or around a community college campus.

(b) The standards and guidelines shall be developed in accordance with the Standardized Emergency Management System and the National Incident Management System, and shall be reviewed by the Office of Emergency Services in a manner that is consistent with existing policy. In developing the standards and guidelines, the chancellor’s office shall consider including all of the
 following:

(1) Information on establishing a campus emergency management team.

(2) Provisions regarding overview training for every employee within one year of commencement of employment.

(3) Information on specialized training for employees who may be designated as part of an emergency management team.

(4) Information on preparedness, prevention, response, recovery, and mitigation policies and procedures.

(5) Information on coordinating with the appropriate local, state, and federal government authorities, and nongovernmental entities
 on comprehensive emergency management and preparedness activities.

(6) A response plan for an active shooter on or around a community college campus.

(c) On or before January 1, 2017, and on or before January 1 every five years thereafter, the chancellor’s office shall review and update, as necessary, the standards and guidelines developed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   (AB 767)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 45. DISTRICTS AND GOVERNING BOARDS [72000. - 72701.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [72000. - 72036.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Naming [72000. - 72000.]

72000.

(a) The district and its governing board may sue and be sued, and shall act in accordance with Section 70902. 

(b) The district name shall be adopted and changed as follows: 

(1) The first governing board of any new community college district shall, at the first meeting of the board or as soon as practicable thereafter, name the district. The district shall be designated as the “____ Community College District.” 

(2) The governing board of a community college district may, by resolution, change the name of the district or of any of the community colleges maintained by the district. However, the name shall continue to contain the words “Community College District” or “Community College,” as appropriate. 

(3) Whenever a petition is presented to the governing board of a community college district, signed by at least 15 qualified electors of any community college district, asking that the name of the district, be changed, the governing board shall, at its next regular meeting, designate a day upon which it will conduct a hearing and act upon the petition, which hearing shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 40 days after that regular meeting. The clerk of the governing board shall give notice to all interested parties by sending a notice of the time for the hearing of the petition. Notices shall be mailed at least 10 days before the day set for the hearing. At the hearing the board shall by resolution either grant or deny the petition, and if the petition is granted, the clerk shall notify the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges of the change of the name of the district or of any community college maintained by the district. 

(4) The name “____ Community College District” and the names of community colleges maintained by the district are the property of the district. No person shall, without permission of the board, use these names, or any abbreviation of them, or any name of which these words are a part in any of the following ways: 

(A) To designate any business, social, political, religious, or other organization, including, but not limited to, any corporation, firm, partnership, association, group, activity or enterprise. 

(B) To imply, indicate or otherwise suggest that any organization, or any product or service of the organization is connected or affiliated with, or is endorsed, favored or supported by, or is opposed by one or more California community colleges, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. 

(C) To display, advertise, or announce these names publicly at or in connection with any meeting, assembly, or demonstration, or any propaganda, advertising or promotional activity of any kind which has for its purpose or any part of its purpose the support, endorsement, advancement, opposition or defeat of any strike, lockout, or boycott or of any political, religious, sociological, or economic movement, activity or program. 

(D) The provisions of this section shall not preclude the use of the name “____ Community College” or “____ Community College District” by any person or organization otherwise subject to this section using the name immediately prior to the effective date of this section, so long as the name is not used in additional, different ways. 

(E) Nothing in this section shall interfere with or restrict the right of any person to make a true and accurate statement in the course of stating his or her experience or qualifications for any academic, governmental, business, or professional credit or enrollment, or in connection with any academic, governmental, professional or other employment whatsoever. 

(5) Any reference to junior colleges or junior college districts in any law shall be deemed to refer to community colleges and community college districts, respectively. 

(c) Meetings of the governing board shall be held as follows: 

(1) Within 20 days after the appointment of the community college board provided for by Section 72023, the board of governors shall call an initial organizational meeting of the board by giving at least 10 days’ notice by registered mail to each member, for the purposes of organizing the community college board. 

At the initial organizational meeting the community college board shall organize by electing a president from its members and a secretary, and may transact any other business relating to the affairs of the community college district. 

(2) (A) The governing board of each community college district shall hold an annual organizational meeting. In a year in which a regular election for governing board members is conducted, the meeting shall be held on a day within a 15-day period that commences with the date upon which a governing board member elected at that election takes office. Organizational meetings in years in which no regular election for governing board members is conducted shall be held during the same 15-day period on the calendar. Unless otherwise provided by rule of the governing board, the day and time of the annual meeting shall be selected by the board at its regular meeting held immediately prior to the first day of such 15-day period, and the board shall notify the county superintendent of schools of the day and time selected. The secretary of the board shall, within 15 days prior to the date of the annual meeting, notify in writing all members and members-elect of the date and time selected for the meeting. 

(B) If the board fails to select a day and time for the meeting, the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district shall, prior to the first day of such 15-day period and after the regular meeting of the board held immediately prior to the first day of the 15-day period, designate the day and time of the annual meeting. The day designated shall be within the 15-day period. He or she shall notify in writing all members and members-elect of the date and time. 

(C) At the annual meeting, the governing board of the community college district shall organize by electing a president, from its members, and a secretary. 

(3) As an alternative to the procedures set forth in paragraph (2), in a community college district the boundaries of which are coterminous with the boundaries of a city and county, the governing board members of which district are elected in accordance with a city and county charter, the annual organizational meeting of the governing board may be held between January 8 and January 31, inclusive, as provided in rules and regulations adopted by the board. At the annual organizational meeting the community college district governing board shall organize by electing a president and vice president from its members. 

(4) Subject to this section, the governing board of any community college district shall hold regular monthly meetings and shall by rule and regulation fix the time and place for its regular meetings. The action shall be given proper notice to all members of the board of the regular meetings. 

(d) The governing board shall conduct its meetings as follows: 

(1) A notice identifying the location, date, and time of the meeting shall be posted in each community college maintained by the district at least 10 days prior to the meeting and shall remain so posted to and including the time of the meeting. 

(2) The governing board shall conduct its meetings within the boundaries of the community college district, except as provided in subparagraphs (A) and (B). 

(A) The governing board may meet outside of its district boundaries for the limited purpose of meeting with another local agency so long as the meeting meets both of the following criteria: 

(i) The meeting occurs within the boundaries of one of the participating local agencies. 

(ii) The meeting is open and accessible to the public, including the residents of the district whose board is meeting outside the boundaries of the district. 

(B) The governing board may meet outside of its district boundaries if the board finds it necessary to meet in closed session with its attorney to discuss pending litigation and if the attorney’s office is located outside of the boundaries of the district. 

(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, the governing board shall act by majority vote of all of the membership constituting the governing board. 

(4) Every official action taken by the governing board of every community college district shall be affirmed by a formal vote of the members of the board, and the governing board of every community college district shall keep minutes of its meetings, and shall maintain a journal of its proceedings in which shall be recorded every official act taken. 

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a community college district governing board consists of seven members and not more than two vacancies occur on the governing board, the vacant position or positions shall not be counted for purposes of determining how many members of the board constitute a majority. Whenever any of the provisions of this code require unanimous action of all or a specific number of the members elected or appointed to the governing board, the vacant position or positions shall be excluded from determination of the total membership constituting the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1038, Sec. 2.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Nondiscrimination [72010. - 72014.]

72010.

The provisions of this article are supplemental to any provision in the Constitution or laws of the United States or Constitution or laws of the State of California, relating to discrimination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

72011.

Every community college district shall provide access to its services, classes, and programs without regard to the characteristics listed in Section 66270.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

72012.

Every community college shall comply with Section 66016, the Equity in Higher Education Act as set forth in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 66250) of Part 40 of Division 5, and other applicable laws relating to discrimination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

72014.

No funds under the control of a community college district shall ever be used for membership or for any participation involving a financial payment or contribution, on behalf of the district or any individual employed by or associated therewith, in any private organization whose membership practices are discriminatory on the basis of the characteristics listed in Section 66270. This section does not apply to any public funds that have been paid to an individual officer or employee of the district as salary, or to any funds that are used directly or indirectly for the benefit of student organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Organization of District Boards [72022. - 72036.5.]

72022.

The county committee on school district organization, upon petition of the governing board of any community college district, may provide for the establishment, rearrangement, or abolishment of trustee areas in any community college district or increase or decrease the number of members of the governing board, in the same manner as trustee areas may be provided for in other districts under Sections 5020 to 5024, inclusive.

When trustee areas are established or rearranged under this section, governing board members shall be elected for four-year terms, and shall be either five or seven in number. The number of trustee areas shall not be less than two nor more than seven. The terms of trustees shall, except as otherwise provided, be staggered so that as nearly as practicable one-half of the trustees shall be elected in each odd-numbered year.

Subject to provisions of this section, any resident and registered elector of the school district not disqualified by the Constitution or laws of the state is eligible to candidacy for, and appointment and election to, the governing board of a community college district in which trustee areas have been provided under this section.

When trustee areas are established or rearranged under this section, the petition to the county committee by the governing board shall provide for election of trustees by one of the following methods:

(a) Election of an elector residing in and registered to vote in the trustee area he seeks to represent, by only the registered electors of the same trustee area;

(b) Election, of an elector residing in and registered to vote in the trustee area he seeks to represent, by the registered electors of the entire community college district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

72023.

In every community college district in which trustee areas have not been established, there shall be a governing board of either five or seven members elected at large from the district to serve a term of four years. If trustee areas have been established in a community college district the governing board shall consist of a member or members from each trustee area. The terms of trustees shall, except as otherwise provided, be staggered so that as nearly as practicable one-half of the trustees shall be elected in each odd-numbered year.

In the Peralta Community College District, the governing board may consist of not to exceed 15 members, if the governing board so determines, whether or not trustee areas have been established.

The governing board of the Redwoods Community College District may consist of eight members, provided the area contained in the Fort Bragg Unified School District and the Mendocino Unified School District is annexed to the Redwoods Community College District, and provided an additional coterminous trustee area of the district is established including such territory. Such governing board may consist of nine members if, in addition to the annexation specified above, the area contained within Del Norte County is annexed to the Redwoods Community College District, and provided an additional coterminous trustee area of the district is established including such territory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

72023.5.

(a) (1) (A) The governing board of each community college district shall order the inclusion within the membership of the governing board, in addition to the number of members otherwise prescribed, of one or more students. These students shall have the right to attend each and all meetings of the governing board, except that student members shall not have the right, or be afforded the opportunity, to attend executive sessions of the governing board.

(B) A student member shall have the opportunity to cast an advisory vote immediately before votes are cast by the regular members of the governing board.

(2) A student selected to serve on the governing board
 shall be enrolled in a community college of the district and shall be chosen, and shall be recalled, by the students enrolled in the community colleges of the district in accordance with procedures prescribed by the governing board. If the seat of a student member becomes vacant during the student member’s term, the governing board may authorize the officers of student body associations established pursuant to Section 76060 at each community college in the district to appoint a student to serve the remainder of the term in accordance with procedures established by the governing board. A student member shall be required throughout the term of
 the student member’s appointment to be enrolled in a community college of the district for at least five semester units, or its equivalent, and shall meet and maintain the minimum standards of scholarship for community college students prescribed by the community college district. The term of a student member shall be one year commencing on June 1 of each year.

(3) A
 student member appointed pursuant to this section shall be entitled to mileage allowance to the same extent as a regular member, but is not entitled to the compensation prescribed by Section 72024.

(4) A student member shall be seated with the members of the governing board and shall be recognized as a full member of the board at the meetings, including receiving all materials presented to the board members and participating in
 the questioning of witnesses and the discussion of issues.

(5) A
 student member shall not be included in determining the vote required to carry any measure before the board.

(6) A
 student member shall not be liable for any acts of the governing board.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a student member selected to serve on the governing board of a community college district pursuant to subdivision (a) may do any of the following:

(1) Make and second motions at the discretion of the governing board.

(2) Attend closed sessions, other than closed sessions on personnel matters or collective bargaining matters, at the discretion of the governing board.

(3) Receive compensation, at the discretion of the governing board, up to the amount prescribed by Section 72024.

(4) Serve a term of one year commencing on May 15 of each year, at the discretion of the governing board.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that any decision or action, including any contract entered into pursuant thereto, upon the motion or second of a motion of a student member, shall be fully legal and enforceable against the community college district or any party thereto.

(d) The governing board of each community college district
 shall, by May 15 of each year, adopt rules and regulations implementing this section. These rules and regulations shall be effective until May 15 of the following year.

(e) If a state court finds this section is unlawful, the court may order, as equitable relief, that the administering entity that is the subject of the lawsuit terminate any waiver awarded under this statute or provision, but no money damages, tuition refund or waiver, or other retroactive relief may be awarded. In any action in which the court finds this section is unlawful, the California Community Colleges are immune from the imposition of any award of money damages, tuition refund or waiver, or other retroactive relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 103, Sec. 1.   (AB 1541)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

72024.

(a) (1) In any community college district that is not located in a city and county, and in which the full-time equivalent students (FTES) for the prior college year exceeded 60,000, the governing board may prescribe, as compensation for the services of each member of the board who actually attends all meetings held by the board, a sum not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) in any month.

(2) In any community college district in which the FTES for the prior college year was 60,000 or less, but more than 25,000, each member of the governing board of the district who actually attends all meetings held by the board may receive as compensation for his or her services a sum not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) in any month.

(3) In any community college district in which the FTES for the prior college year was 25,000 or less, but more than 10,000, each member of the governing board of the district who actually attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for his or her services a sum not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400) in any month.

(4) In any community college district in which the FTES for the prior college year was 10,000 or less, but more than 1,000, each member of the governing board of the district who actually attends all meetings held by the board may receive as compensation for his or her services a sum not to exceed two hundred forty dollars ($240) in any month.

(5) In any community college district in which the FTES for the prior college year was 1,000 or less, but more than 150, each member of the governing board of the district who actually attends all meetings held by the board may receive as compensation for his or her services a sum not to exceed one hundred twenty dollars ($120) in any month.

(b) Any member of a governing board who does not attend all meetings held by the board in any month may receive, as compensation for his or her services, an amount not greater than a pro rata share of the number of meetings actually attended based upon the maximum compensation authorized by this subdivision.

(c) The compensation of members of the governing board of a community college district newly organized or reorganized shall be governed by subdivision (a). For this purpose, the total FTES in all of the community colleges of the district in the college year in which the organization or reorganization became effective shall be deemed to be the FTES in the district for the prior college year.

(d) A member may be paid for any meeting when absent if the board, by resolution duly adopted and included in its minutes, finds that, at the time of the meeting, he or she is performing services outside the meeting for the community college district, he or she was ill or on jury duty, or the absence was due to a hardship deemed acceptable by the board. The compensation shall be a charge against the funds of the district.
